Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-962
Autism Treatment Program Act; act, how cited.

Sections 68-962 to 68-966 shall be known and may be cited as the Autism Treatment Program Act.

Laws 2007, LB482, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1,138;

Laws 2009, LB27, § 2.
May 27, 2009